Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.080

Local improvement districts authorized—Special assessments—Bonds.

(1) A district may form a local improvement district to provide any transportation improvement it has the authority to provide, impose special assessments on all property specially benefited by the transportation improvements, and issue special assessment bonds or revenue bonds to fund the costs of the transportation improvement. Local improvement districts shall be created and administered, and assessments shall be made and collected, in the manner and to the extent provided by law to cities and towns pursuant to chapters 35.43, 35.44, 35.49, 35.50, 35.51, 35.53, and 35.54 RCW. However, the duties devolving upon the city or town treasurer under these chapters shall be imposed upon the district treasurer for the purposes of this section. A local improvement district may only be formed under this section pursuant to the petition method under RCW 35.43.120 and 35.43.125.

(2) The governing body of a district shall by resolution establish for each special assessment bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges, if any, covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. The maximum term of any special assessment bonds shall not exceed thirty years beyond the date of issue. Special assessment bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be an indebtedness of the district issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from special assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were issued and any local improvement guaranty fund that the district has created. The owner or bearer of a special assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section shall not have any claim against the district arising from the bond or coupon except for the payment from special assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were issued and any local improvement guaranty fund the district has created. The district issuing the special assessment bonds is not liable to the owner or bearer of any special assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section for any loss occurring in the lawful operation of its local improvement guaranty fund. The substance of the limitations included in this subsection (2) shall be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each special assessment bond issued pursuant to this section.

(3) Assessments shall reflect any credits given by a district for real property or property right donations made pursuant to RCW 47.14.030.

(4) The governing body may establish, administer, and pay money into a local improvement guaranty fund, in the manner and to the extent provided by law to cities and towns under chapter 35.54 RCW, to guarantee special assessment bonds issued by the district.

[ 2005 c 336 s 8; 1987 c 327 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.